Alabama, session 2026rs, HB593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
27 Section 1. Sections 28-4A-1 through 28-4A-6, Code of
28 Alabama 1975, are designated as Article 1 of Chapter 4A of
Page 1

Alabama 1975, are designated as Article 1 of Chapter 4A of
HB593 Enrolled
29 Title 28 and are amended to read as follows:
30 Article 1. General Provisions; Small Craft Alcoholic
31 Beverage manufacturers.
32 "§28-4A-1
33 This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the
34 "Alabama Brewpub Small Craft Alcoholic Beverages Act.""
35 "§28-4A-2
36 (a) The words and phrases terms used in this chapter
37 shall have the meanings ascribed to them as defined in Section
38 28-3-1, and any acts amendatory thereof, supplementary thereto
39 or substituted therefor.
40 (b) The For purposes of this chapter, the following
41 words or phrases, whenever they appear in this chapter, unless
42 the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall have the
43 meaning ascribed to them in this subsectionterms have the
44 following meanings:
45 (1) BREWPUB. Any premises upon which beer is actively
46 and continuously manufactured or brewed, subject to the barrel
47 production limitation prescribed in this chapterArticle 2, for
48 consumption on the premises where manufactured, or for sale to
49 any designated wholesaler licensee for resale to retail
50 licensees.
51 (2) HYBRID CRAFT ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE COMPLEX. A campus
52 or area upon which a brewpub, a small craft distillery, and a
53 small craft winery, or any combination of these, operate under
54 one license issued by the board pursuant to this article.
55 (2)(3) PREMISES. Any building, or structure, or portion
56 thereof, designated as a historic building and site as defined
Page 2

thereof, designated as a historic building and site as defined
HB593 Enrolled
57 in Section 40-8-1, or located in a registered historic
58 district or located in any economically distressed area
59 designated as suitable by the municipal or county governing
60 body, in which is located the operations of a brewpub, a small
61 craft distillery, or a small craft winery.
62 (4) SMALL CRAFT DISTILLERY. Any premises upon which
63 liquor is actively and continuously manufactured or distilled,
64 subject to the production volume limitation prescribed in
65 Article 3, for consumption on the premises where manufactured,
66 or for sale to the board or a liquor wholesaler licensee for
67 resale to retail licensees.
68 (5) SMALL CRAFT WINERY. Any premises upon which table
69 wine is actively and continuously manufactured, subject to the
70 production volume limitation prescribed in Article 4, for
71 consumption on the premises where manufactured, or for sale to
72 any designated wine wholesaler licensee for resale to retail
73 licensees."
74 "§28-4A-3
75 (a) In addition to the licenses authorized to be issued
76 and renewed by the board pursuant to the Alcoholic Beverage
77 Licensing Code codified as Chapter 3A of this title, the
78 board, upon applicant's compliance with this chapter, Chapter
79 3A, and the rules adopted thereunder, and the conditions set
80 forth in subsection (b), may issue to a qualified applicant a
81 brewpub license which shall authorize the licensee to do all
82 of the following:
83 (1) Manufacture or brew beer, in a quantity not to
84 exceed 10,000 barrels in any one year, and to sell beer brewed
Page 3

exceed 10,000 barrels in any one year, and to sell beer brewed
HB593 Enrolled
85 on the licensed premises in unpackaged form at retail for
86 on-premises consumption at the licensed premises only.
87 (2) Sell beer brewed on the licensed premises in
88 packaged form at retail for off-premises consumption, provided
89 the beer sold for off-premises consumption may not exceed 864
90 ounces per customer per day and shall be sealed, labeled,
91 packaged, and taxed in accordance with state and federal laws
92 and regulations.
93 (3) Sell beer brewed on the premises in original,
94 unopened barrel or keg containers to any licensed wholesaler
95 designated by a brewpub licensee pursuant to Sections 28-8-2
96 and 28-9-3 for resale to retail licensees.
97 (4) Donate and deliver up to 31 gallons of the
98 licensee's beer to a licensed charitable special event
99 operated by or on behalf of a nonprofit organization;
100 provided, however, donations shall be taxed in accordance with
101 state and federal laws and regulations, and any beer remaining
102 at the conclusion of the charitable event shall be returned to
103 the brewpub for disposal.
104 (5) Purchase beer, including draft or keg beer, in
105 original, unopened containers from licensed wholesalers and to
106 sell such beer at retail for on-premises consumption only, in
107 a room or rooms or place on the licensed premises at all times
108 accessible to the use and accommodation of the general public.
109 (b) A brewpub is subject to all of the following
110 conditions:
111 (1) The proposed location of the premises shall not, at
112 the time of the original application, be prohibited by a valid
Page 4

the time of the original application, be prohibited by a valid
HB593 Enrolled
113 zoning ordinance or other ordinance in the valid exercise of
114 police power by the governing body of the municipality or
115 county in which the brewpub is located.
116 (2) Beer brewed by the brewpub licensee shall be
117 packaged or contained in barrels from which the beer is to be
118 dispensed only on the premises where brewed for consumption on
119 the premises or sold in original, unopened barrel or keg
120 containers to any designated wholesaler licensee for resale to
121 retailer licensees.
122 (3) The brewpub must contain and operate a restaurant
123 or otherwise provide food for consumption on the premises.
124 (4) The brewpub may not sell any alcoholic beverages if
125 it is not actively and continuously engaged in the manufacture
126 or brewing of alcoholic beverages on the brewpub's licensed
127 premises.
128 (c) The annual license fee levied and prescribed for a
129 license as a brewpub issued or renewed by the board is one
130 thousand dollars ($1,000).
131 (d) A manufacturer that sells, on an annual basis, an
132 amount equal to no more than 60,000 barrels of beer, may have
133 a financial interest in a brewpub, including a brewpub that
134 also has a restaurant retail license, provided the
135 manufacturer may not transfer alcoholic beverages directly
136 from the manufacturer to the brewpub, but may purchase
137 alcoholic beverages from an authorized wholesaler or as
138 otherwise provided by law, and may not have a financial
139 interest in any retailer other than a brewpub.
140 (e) Section 28-3-4 and subsection (b) of Section
Page 5

(e) Section 28-3-4 and subsection (b) of Section
HB593 Enrolled
141 28-3A-6 shall not be applicable with regard to beer brewed by
142 either of the following and sold and dispensed on the brewpub
143 premises:
144 (1) The brewpub.
145 (2) A manufacturer described in, and in compliance
146 with, subsection (d).
147 (a) In addition to the licenses provided for in
148 Articles 2 through 4, the board may issue a hybrid craft
149 alcoholic beverage complex license to any person licensed as a
150 brewpub, small craft distillery, or small craft winery, or who
151 meets the qualification for licensure as a brewpub, a small
152 craft distillery, or a small craft winery, and who meets the
153 qualifications in subsection (b). A hybrid craft alcoholic
154 beverage complex license shall authorize the licensee to
155 operate a brewpub, a small craft winery, or a small craft
156 distillery, or any combination of these.
157 (b) To qualify as a hybrid craft alcoholic beverage
158 complex:
159 (1) The applicant must meet the license qualifications
160 under Article 2, 3, or 4, as applicable, corresponding to the
161 type or types of alcoholic beverages the applicant intends to
162 manufacture; and
163 (2) Each type of alcoholic beverage must be
164 manufactured on a separate premises, as determined, by rule,
165 by the board, but all the properties upon which the premises
166 are located must be contiguous and walkable.
167 (c) If the applicant already holds a valid, current
168 license under Article 2, 3, or 4 when making application for a
Page 6

license under Article 2, 3, or 4 when making application for a
HB593 Enrolled
169 license under this section, the board may convert the existing
170 license into a hybrid craft alcoholic beverage complex
171 license.
172 (d)(1) The annual license fee levied and prescribed for
173 a license as a hybrid craft alcoholic beverage complex issued
174 or renewed by the board is two thousand dollars ($2,000).
175 (2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1), if the board
176 converts an existing license into a hybrid craft alcoholic
177 beverage complex license, the initial license fee shall be one
178 thousand dollars ($1,000) and each annual renewal fee shall be
179 as provided in subdivision (1)."
180 "§28-4A-4
181 (a) In addition to the licenses provided for by this
182 chapter and any county or municipal license, there is levied
183 on the brewpub for on-premises sales of beer brewed by the
184 brewpub licensee the privilege or excise taxes imposed by
185 Sections 28-3-184 and 28-3-190. Every brewpub licensee shall
186 file the tax returns, pay the taxes, and perform all
187 obligations imposed on wholesalers at the times and places set
188 forth therein. It shall be unlawful for any brewpub licensee
189 who is required to pay the taxes so imposed in the first
190 instance to fail or refuse to add to the sales price and
191 collect from the purchaser the required amount of tax, it
192 being the intent and purpose of this provision that each of
193 the taxes levied is in fact a tax on the consumer, with the
194 brewpub licensee who pays the tax in the first instance acting
195 merely as an agent of the state for the collection and payment
196 of the tax levied by Section 28-3-184 and as an agent of the
Page 7

of the tax levied by Section 28-3-184 and as an agent of the
HB593 Enrolled
197 county or municipality for the collection and payment of the
198 tax levied by Section 28-3-190. Taxes on beer shall be levied
199 at the time the beer is allocated for the purpose of retail
200 sale and not at the time the beer is dispensed for
201 consumption.
202 (b) The brewpub shall be required to keep and maintain
203 all of the records otherwise required to be kept and
204 maintained by manufacturer, wholesaler, and retailer
205 licensees.
206 (c) The brewpub shall appoint a licensed wholesaler
207 designee in order to preserve Section 28-9-1. In addition, for
208 on-premises sales of beer brewed by the brewpub licensee, the
209 brewpub shall be exempt from Sections 28-9-3 through 28-9-11.
210 The board may adopt rules to administer and enforce
211 this chapter."
212 "§28-4A-5
213 A violation of any provision of this chapter shall
214 constitute an unlawful act. A finding by the board that the
215 The board shall revoke the license of a brewpub, licensee is
216 guilty of violating any provision of a small craft distillery,
217 a small craft winery, or a hybrid craft alcoholic beverage
218 complex if the board makes a finding that the licensee
219 violated this chapter shall effect an automatic revocation of
220 the license."
221 "§28-4A-6
222 The Legislature finds that it is in the best interest
223 of the public welfare of the State of Alabama to preserve and
224 redevelop the downtown municipal areas and registered historic
Page 8

redevelop the downtown municipal areas and registered historic
HB593 Enrolled
225 districts and certain economically distressed areas of this
226 state and to further promote the preservation and
227 redevelopment of historic buildings and sites. The Legislature
228 finds that an effective way of facilitating the urban
229 redevelopment program and the preservation of historic
230 buildings and sites, and registered historic districts and any
231 economically distressed area designated as suitable by the
232 municipal or county governing body is by creating a single
233 exception to the existing alcoholic beverage laws to authorize
234 and permit the establishment of brewpubs, small craft
235 wineries, and small craft distilleries located in such
236 historic buildings, sites, or districts in urban redevelopment
237 areas or economically distressed areas of those municipalities
238 located within counties where the brewing of beer for
239 consumption by the public had historically been located or
240 counties. The policy and intent of the Legislature in the
241 enactment of this chapter is to promote the public welfare by
242 further regulating and controlling alcoholic beverage
243 transactions in Alabama under the control and supervision of
244 the Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control Board to accomplish
245 this legislative purpose set forth herein."
246 Section 2. Sections 28-4A-7, 28-4A-8, and 28-4A-9 are
247 added to Article 1 of Chapter 4A of Title 28, Code of Alabama
248 1975, to read as follows:
249 §28-4A-7
250 (a) A license issued under this article, or under
251 Article 2, 3, or 4, authorizes the licensee to afford patrons
252 the opportunity to participate in a guided tour of the
Page 9

the opportunity to participate in a guided tour of the
HB593 Enrolled
253 distillery, brewery, or winery manufacturer operations as
254 applicable, if the tour includes an educational component in
255 which an in-person guide informs patrons about the historic
256 and scientific characteristics of the alcoholic beverage
257 manufactured on the licensed premises.
258 (b) A licensee may offer a tasting or sampling of the
259 alcoholic beverage manufactured on the licensed premises upon
260 conclusion of the tour in accordance with all of the following
261 requirements:
262 (1) A tasting session shall be in a designated,
263 enclosed area that is separate from all other designated areas
264 on the licensed premises.
265 (2) A patron may tour the manufacturing operation of
266 more than one type of alcoholic beverage manufactured by the
267 licensee, but may participate in no more than one tasting
268 session per day.
269 (3) The price of the tasting or sampling must be
270 included in the price charged to patrons over 21 years of age
271 for the guided tour.
272 (4) No retail sale of an alcoholic beverage, whether
273 for on-premises or off-premises consumption, shall be
274 authorized pursuant to a tour.
275 (5) Each session shall be limited to no more than two
276 tastings or samplings, each of which:
277 a. In the case of liquor, shall not exceed one-half
278 ounce, with or without a nonalcoholic mixer;
279 b. In the case of beer, shall not exceed four ounces;
280 and
Page 10

and
HB593 Enrolled
281 c. In the case of table wine, shall not exceed one and
282 one-half ounce.
283 §28-4A-8
284 (a) For purposes of this section, a "public event" is
285 any event sponsored by a private or nonprofit organization
286 lasting no longer than three consecutive days, to which the
287 public is invited, whether free or upon payment for admission,
288 including, but not limited to, a farmers market, music
289 festival, art festival, or other exhibition to which vendors
290 may be invited to display and sell their products.
291 (b)(1) Upon application to the board upon a form
292 prescribed by the board, at least 20 days in advance of the
293 event and accompanied by a nonrefundable fee not to exceed one
294 hundred fifty dollars ($150), the board may issue a tasting
295 room extension license to an applicant that is licensed under
296 this chapter.
297 (2) A tasting room extension license issued to a
298 licensee under this chapter authorizes the recipient to do all
299 of the following with respect to an alcoholic beverage
300 manufactured on the recipient's premises at a public event:
301 a. Dispense samples of the alcoholic beverage to event
302 attendees from an original container, of no more than one-half
303 ounce in the case of liquor, four ounces in the case of beer,
304 and one and one-half ounces in the case of table wine.
305 b. Sell the alcoholic beverage at retail, packaged for
306 consumption off the event site in accordance with state and
307 federal laws and regulations, including, but not limited to,
308 federal regulations related to standard of fill:
Page 11

federal regulations related to standard of fill:
HB593 Enrolled
309 1. For liquor, in bottles not to exceed a total of 4.5
310 liters per customer per day;
311 2. For beer, in bottles or cans not to exceed a total
312 of 864 ounces per customer per day; or
313 3. For table wine, a total not to exceed twelve
314 750-milliliter bottles per customer per day.
315 (c) A tasting room extension licensee may not sell any
316 alcoholic beverage to retailers or sell alcoholic beverages
317 that the licensee does not manufacture.
318 (d) A tasting room extension licensee who is licensed
319 pursuant to this article may only dispense samples or sell for
320 consumption pursuant to subsection (b), one type of alcoholic
321 beverage which it manufactures.
322 (e) The board may issue a tasting room extension
323 license upon submission by the applicant of the following:
324 (1) Proof of compliance with any municipal or county
325 license or permit requirement.
326 (2) Proof of registration, including payment of a booth
327 fee as acknowledged by the event sponsor, to include defining
328 the area under each applicant's exclusive control.
329 (3) Proof of liquor liability insurance, including a
330 written statement from the applicant's liquor liability
331 insurer that the applicant's existing policy covers the
332 activities of the applicant at the public event.
333 (f) Any licensee under this chapter shall be limited to
334 no more than 12 tasting room extension licenses per calendar
335 year.
336 (g)(1) A tasting room extension licensee shall collect
Page 12

(g)(1) A tasting room extension licensee shall collect
HB593 Enrolled
337 and remit all state and local sales and use taxes and all
338 excise and other taxes due, pursuant to Article 2, 3, or 4 as
339 applicable, on the sale of the alcoholic beverage by the
340 participant licensee to customers at retail.
341 (2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1), a tasting room
342 extension licensee that also sells an alcoholic beverage at
343 retail, in a method and manner established by the Department
344 of Revenue, may include the collection and remittance of all
345 state and local taxes due on the sale of the alcoholic
346 beverage sold at the public event in the same method and
347 manner as other sales of the same alcoholic beverage at
348 retail.
349 (3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter
350 in any way the distribution of revenue from a tax levied
351 pursuant to a local law.
352 (h) The board is authorized to adopt rules and
353 prescribe forms to implement and enforce this section.
354 §28-4A-9
355 (a) For purposes of this section, a "licensed
356 manufacturer" includes a manufacturer who is licensed pursuant
357 to this chapter or Section 28-3A-6.
358 (b) Upon approval of the board, a licensed manufacturer
359 may be allowed one off-premises manufacturer extension
360 location for the exclusive storage of finished and unfinished
361 goods pursuant to the requirements of subsection (c).
362 (c) An application for approval of an off-premises
363 manufacturer extension location shall include:
364 (1) Documentation of approval of the manufacturer
Page 13

(1) Documentation of approval of the manufacturer
HB593 Enrolled
365 extension by the Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau;
366 (2) A lease, deed, or other document showing control of
367 the property by the licensed manufacturer; and
368 (3) A current license issued by the board.
369 (d) The application for an off-premises manufacturing
370 extension must be approved by the board before it is put into
371 use by the manufacturer licensee.
372 (e) An off-premises manufacturing extension is subject
373 to all of the following conditions:
374 (1) The extension may not be located outside of the
375 state.
376 (2) The extension may not be used for the exportation
377 of products nor for any form of distribution of products
378 within the state.
379 (3) The extension may not be located more than 10 miles
380 from the licensed manufacturer's premises.
381 (4) No sales, sampling, or tastings of any alcoholic
382 beverage shall be allowed at the extension.
383 (5) The extension premises shall be secured at all
384 times.
385 (f) Authorized representatives of the board or law
386 enforcement officers of the state, or the county or
387 municipality in which the manufacturer extension premises is
388 located, may enter and search, without a warrant, the
389 extension premises. The extension premises encompasses any
390 building owned or occupied by the licensee that adjoins, is
391 adjacent to, or is otherwise part of the curtilage of the
392 premises, including a building used as a private dwelling.
Page 14

premises, including a building used as a private dwelling.
HB593 Enrolled
393 (g) The licensed manufacturer shall maintain all
394 records related to the disposition of the finished or
395 unfinished goods stored in the off-premises extension, as
396 applicable.
397 (h) The finished and unfinished goods may be
398 transported in bond from the licensed manufacturer's original
399 premises to the extension location for storage. Transportation
400 shall be made by the licensee or an employee of the same in a
401 vehicle bearing signage on each side identifying the licensee.
402 Included in the transportation vehicle shall be a current copy
403 of the board's approval of the extension and the bill of
404 lading or other documentation of ownership of the product
405 being transported.
406 Section 3. A new Article 2, commencing with Section
407 28-4A-20; Article 3, commencing with Section 28-4A-40; and
408 Article 4, commencing with Section 28-4A-60, are added to
409 Chapter 4A of Title 28, Code of Alabama 1975, to read as
410 follows:
411 Article 2. Brewpubs.
412 §28-4A-20
413 (a) In addition to the licenses authorized to be issued
414 and renewed by the board pursuant to Chapter 3A, the board,
415 upon the applicant's compliance with this article, Chapter 3A,
416 and the rules adopted thereunder, and the conditions set forth
417 in subsection (b), may issue to a qualified applicant a
418 brewpub license that shall authorize the licensee to do all of
419 the following:
420 (1) Manufacture or brew beer, in a quantity not to
Page 15

(1) Manufacture or brew beer, in a quantity not to
HB593 Enrolled
421 exceed 10,000 barrels in any one year, and sell beer brewed on
422 the licensed premises in unpackaged form at retail for
423 on-premises consumption at the licensed premises only.
424 (2) Sell beer brewed on the licensed premises in
425 packaged form at retail for off-premises consumption, provided
426 the beer sold for off-premises consumption may not exceed 864
427 ounces per customer per day and shall be sealed, labeled,
428 packaged, and taxed in accordance with state, local, and
429 federal laws, rules, and regulations.
430 (3) Sell beer brewed on the premises in original,
431 unopened barrel or keg containers or in other original,
432 unopened containers to any licensed beer wholesaler designated
433 by a brewpub licensee pursuant to Sections 28-8-2 and 28-9-3
434 for resale to retail licensees.
435 (4) Donate and deliver up to 31 gallons of the
436 licensee's beer to a licensed charitable special event
437 operated by or on behalf of a nonprofit organization.
438 Donations shall be taxed in accordance with state, local, and
439 federal laws, rules, and regulations, and any beer remaining
440 at the conclusion of the charitable event shall be returned to
441 the brewpub for disposal.
442 (5) Purchase beer, including draft or keg beer, in
443 original, unopened containers from licensed wholesalers and
444 sell the beer at retail, for on-premises consumption only, in
445 a room or rooms or place on the licensed premises at all times
446 accessible to the use and accommodation of the general public.
447 (b) A brewpub is subject to all of the following
448 conditions:
Page 16

conditions:
HB593 Enrolled
449 (1) The proposed location of the premises, at the time
450 of the original application, shall not be prohibited by a
451 valid zoning ordinance or other ordinance in the valid
452 exercise of police power by the governing body of the
453 municipality or county in which the brewpub is located.
454 (2) Beer brewed by the brewpub licensee shall be
455 packaged or contained in barrels from which the beer is to be
456 dispensed only on the premises where brewed for consumption on
457 the premises, or sold in original, unopened barrel or keg
458 containers or in packaged form to any designated wholesaler
459 licensee for resale to retailer licensees.
460 (3) A brewpub must contain and operate a restaurant or
461 otherwise provide food for consumption on the premises.
462 (4) A brewpub may not sell any alcoholic beverages if
463 the brewpub is not actively and continuously engaged in the
464 manufacture or brewing of beer on the brewpub's licensed
465 premises.
466 (c) The annual license fee levied and prescribed for a
467 license as a brewpub issued or renewed by the board is one
468 thousand dollars ($1,000).
469 (d) A manufacturer that sells, on an annual basis, an
470 amount equal to no more than 60,000 barrels of beer, may have
471 a financial interest in a brewpub, including a brewpub that
472 also has a restaurant retail license, provided the
473 manufacturer may not transfer alcoholic beverages directly
474 from the manufacturer to the brewpub, but may purchase
475 alcoholic beverages from an authorized wholesaler or as
476 otherwise provided by law, and may not have a financial
Page 17

otherwise provided by law, and may not have a financial
HB593 Enrolled
477 interest in any retailer other than a brewpub.
478 (e) Sections 28-3-4 and 28-3A-6(b) shall not be
479 applicable with regard to beer brewed by either of the
480 following and sold and dispensed on the brewpub premises:
481 (1) The brewpub.
482 (2) A manufacturer described in, and in compliance
483 with, subsection (d).
484 (f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter
485 in any way the distribution of revenue from a tax levied
486 pursuant to a local law.
487 §28-4A-21
488 (a) In addition to the licenses provided for by this
489 chapter and any county or municipal license, there is levied
490 on the brewpub licensee for on-premises sales of beer brewed
491 by the brewpub licensee the privilege or excise taxes imposed
492 by Sections 28-3-184 and 28-3-190. Every brewpub licensee
493 shall file the tax returns, pay the taxes, and perform all
494 obligations imposed on wholesalers at the times and places set
495 forth therein. It shall be unlawful for any brewpub licensee
496 who is required to pay the taxes so imposed in the first
497 instance to fail or refuse to add to the sales price and
498 collect from the purchaser the required amount of tax, it
499 being the intent and purpose of this provision that each of
500 the taxes levied is in fact a tax on the consumer, with the
501 brewpub licensee who pays the tax in the first instance acting
502 merely as an agent of the state for the collection and payment
503 of the tax levied by Section 28-3-184 and as an agent of the
504 county or municipality for the collection and payment of the
Page 18

county or municipality for the collection and payment of the
HB593 Enrolled
505 tax levied by Section 28-3-190. Taxes on beer shall be levied
506 at the time the beer is allocated for the purpose of retail
507 sale and not at the time the beer is dispensed for
508 consumption.
509 (b) The brewpub shall keep and maintain all of the
510 records otherwise required to be kept and maintained by
511 manufacturer, wholesaler, and retailer licensees.
512 (c) The brewpub shall appoint a licensed wholesaler
513 designee in order to preserve Section 28-9-1. In addition, for
514 on-premises sales of beer brewed by the brewpub licensee, the
515 brewpub shall be exempt from Sections 28-9-3 through 28-9-11.
516 Article 3. Small Craft Distilleries.
517 §28-4A-40
518 (a) In addition to the licenses authorized to be issued
519 and renewed by the board pursuant to Chapter 3A, the board,
520 upon the applicant's compliance with this article, Chapter 3A,
521 and the rules adopted thereunder, and the conditions set forth
522 in subsection (b), may issue to a qualified applicant a small
523 craft distillery license which shall authorize the licensee to
524 do all of the following:
525 (1) Distill liquor, in a quantity not to exceed 50,000
526 gallons in any one year, and sell liquor distilled on the
527 licensed premises in unpackaged form at retail for on-premises
528 consumption at the licensed premises only.
529 (2) Sell liquor distilled on the licensed premises in
530 original, unopened containers at retail for off-premises
531 consumption, provided the liquor sold for off-premises
532 consumption may not exceed 4.5 liters per customer per day and
Page 19

consumption may not exceed 4.5 liters per customer per day and
HB593 Enrolled
533 shall be sealed, labeled, packaged, and taxed in accordance
534 with state, local, and federal laws, rules, and regulations.
535 (3) Sell liquor distilled on the premises in original,
536 unopened containers to the board or as authorized by the
537 board.
538 (4) Donate and deliver up to 4.5 liters of the
539 licensee's liquor to a licensed charitable special event
540 operated by or on behalf of a nonprofit organization.
541 Donations shall be taxed in accordance with state, local, and
542 federal laws, rules, and regulations. Any liquor remaining at
543 the conclusion of the charitable event shall be returned to
544 the small craft distillery for disposal.
545 (5) Purchase liquor in original, unopened containers
546 from the board or as authorized by the board and sell the
547 liquor at retail, for on-premises consumption only, in a room
548 or rooms or place on the licensed premises at all times
549 accessible to the use and accommodation of the general public
550 and limited to individuals 21 years of age and older.
551 (b) A small craft distillery is subject to all of the
552 following conditions:
553 (1) The proposed location of the premises, at the time
554 of the original application, shall not be prohibited by a
555 valid zoning ordinance or other ordinance in the valid
556 exercise of police power by the governing body of the
557 municipality or county in which the small craft distillery is
558 located.
559 (2) Liquor distilled by the licensee shall be packaged
560 and sold in any original or unopened containers as approved by
Page 20

and sold in any original or unopened containers as approved by
HB593 Enrolled
561 the board and in accordance with the standards of fill
562 requirements prescribed by the U.S. Department of the Treasury
563 or contained in barrels or kegs from which the liquor is to be
564 dispensed only on the premises where distilled for consumption
565 on the premises.
566 (3) A small craft distillery may not sell any liquor if
567 the small craft distillery is not actively and continuously
568 engaged in the distilling of liquor on the licensed premises.
569 (c) The annual license fee levied and prescribed for a
570 license as a small craft distillery issued or renewed by the
571 board is one thousand dollars ($1,000).
572 (d) Sections 28-3-4 and 28-3A-6(b) shall not be
573 applicable with regard to liquor distilled by the small craft
574 distillery and sold and dispensed on the licensed premises.
575 (e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter
576 in any way the distribution of revenue from a tax levied
577 pursuant to a local law.
578 §28-4A-41
579 (a)(1) In addition to the licenses provided for by this
580 chapter and any county or municipal license, there is levied
581 and assessed upon all liquor distilled on the premises of a
582 licensee which is dispensed or sold at retail for on-premises
583 or off-premises consumption the mark up in accordance with
584 Section 28-3-53.2(c) and added to the list or FOB price; and
585 the privilege or excise tax imposed on liquor by Sections
586 28-3-200 through 28-3-205. Taxes and mark up described in this
587 subsection shall be remitted by the licensee to the board. The
588 taxes collected shall be distributed in the same manner as the
Page 21

taxes collected shall be distributed in the same manner as the
HB593 Enrolled
589 taxes collected in a state liquor store.
590 (2) The tax levied in this subsection shall be
591 collected by a return which shall be filed by the licensee
592 with the board postmarked not later than the last day of the
593 month following the month of production or sale of liquor,
594 which shall be accompanied by the remittance of the tax due.
595 The report shall include, but not be limited to, a
596 consolidated report of all liquor distilled, sold, or
597 otherwise consumed on the licensed premises. The report shall
598 be in the form and containing information as the board may
599 prescribe.
600 (3) If a licensee fails to file any return required to
601 be filed with the board on or before the date prescribed in
602 subdivision (2), including any written extension of time
603 granted by the board in advance, there shall be assessed as a
604 penalty the greater of 10 percent of any additional tax
605 required to be paid with the return or fifty dollars ($50).
606 (4) If a licensee fails to pay to the board the amount
607 of the tax due on a return required to be filed on or before
608 the date prescribed for payment of the tax, including any
609 written extension of time granted by the board in advance,
610 there shall be added as a penalty 10 percent of the unpaid
611 amount due on the return.
612 (5) Interest shall be added to any tax due to the board
613 which is not paid by the due date, from the due date of the
614 tax, computed based on the underpayment rate established by
615 the Secretary of the Treasury under the authority of 26 U.S.C.
616 § 6621.
Page 22

§ 6621.
HB593 Enrolled
617 (b) A small craft distillery shall be required to keep
618 and maintain all of the records otherwise required to be kept
619 and maintained by manufacturer, wholesaler, and retailer
620 licensees.
621 Article 4. Small Craft Wineries.
622 §28-4A-60
623 (a) In addition to the licenses authorized to be issued
624 and renewed by the board pursuant to Chapter 3A, the board,
625 upon the applicant's compliance with this article, Chapter 3A,
626 and the rules adopted thereunder, and the conditions set forth
627 in subsection (b), may issue to a qualified applicant a small
628 craft winery license which shall authorize the licensee to do
629 all of the following:
630 (1) Manufacture or produce table wine, in a quantity
631 not to exceed 50,000 gallons in any one year, and sell wine
632 manufactured on the licensed premises at retail for
633 on-premises consumption at the licensed premises only.
634 (2) Sell table wine manufactured on the licensed
635 premises in original, unopened containers at retail for
636 off-premises consumption, provided the wine sold for
637 off-premises consumption may not exceed twelve 750-milliliter
638 bottles per customer per day and shall be sealed, labeled,
639 packaged, and taxed in accordance with state, local, and
640 federal laws, rules, and regulations.
641 (3) Sell table wine manufactured on the premises in
642 original, unopened containers to any licensed wine wholesaler
643 designated by a small craft winery licensee pursuant to
644 Section 28-8A-4 for resale to retail licensees.
Page 23

Section 28-8A-4 for resale to retail licensees.
HB593 Enrolled
645 (4) Donate and deliver up to two cases of the
646 licensee's table wine to a licensed charitable special event
647 operated by or on behalf of a nonprofit organization.
648 Donations shall be taxed in accordance with state, local, and
649 federal laws, rules, and regulations. Any wine remaining at
650 the conclusion of the charitable event shall be returned to
651 the small craft winery for disposal.
652 (5) Purchase table wine in original, unopened
653 containers from licensed wine wholesalers and sell the wine at
654 retail for on-premises consumption only, in a room or rooms or
655 place on the licensed premises at all times accessible to the
656 use and accommodation of the general public.
657 (b) A small craft winery is subject to all of the
658 following conditions:
659 (1) The proposed location of the premises, at the time
660 of the original application, shall not be prohibited by a
661 valid zoning ordinance or other ordinance in the valid
662 exercise of police power by the governing body of the
663 municipality or county in which the small craft distillery is
664 located.
665 (2) Wine manufactured by the licensee shall be packaged
666 and sold in any original containers as approved by the board
667 and in accordance with the standards of fill requirements
668 prescribed by the U.S. Department of the Treasury or contained
669 in bottles to be dispensed only on the premises where
670 fermented for consumption on the premises.
671 (3) A small craft winery may not sell any table wine if
672 the small craft winery is not actively and continuously
Page 24

the small craft winery is not actively and continuously
HB593 Enrolled
673 engaged in the production of table wine on the licensed
674 premises.
675 (c) The annual license fee levied and prescribed for a
676 license as a small craft winery issued or renewed by the board
677 is one thousand dollars ($1,000).
678 (d) Sections 28-3-4 and 28-3A-6(b) shall not be
679 applicable with regard to wine manufactured by the small craft
680 winery and sold and dispensed on the licensed premises.
681 (e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter
682 in any way the distribution of revenue from a tax levied
683 pursuant to a local law.
684 §28-4A-61
685 (a) In addition to the licenses provided for by this
686 chapter and any county or municipal license, there is levied
687 on a small craft winery for on-premises and off-premises sales
688 of table wine manufactured by the licensee privilege and
689 excise tax pursuant to Section 28-7-16 due on the sale of
690 table wine to consumers. Every small craft winery licensee
691 shall file the tax returns, pay the taxes, and perform all
692 obligations imposed on wholesalers at the times and places set
693 forth therein. It shall be unlawful for any small craft winery
694 licensee who is required to pay the taxes so imposed in the
695 first instance to fail or refuse to add to the sales price and
696 collect from the purchaser the required amount of tax, it
697 being the intent and purpose of this provision that each of
698 the taxes levied is in fact a tax on the consumer, with the
699 small craft winery licensee who pays the tax in the first
700 instance acting merely as an agent of the state for the
Page 25

instance acting merely as an agent of the state for the
HB593 Enrolled
701 collection and payment of the tax.
702 (b) A small craft winery shall be required to keep and
703 maintain all of the records otherwise required to be kept and
704 maintained by manufacturer, wholesaler, and retailer
705 licensees.
706 (c) A small craft winery shall appoint a licensed
707 wholesaler designee pursuant to Section 28-8A-4 for any table
708 wine designated for resale to retail licensees.
709 Section 4. Section 28-3A-13.1, Code of Alabama 1975, is
710 amended to make conforming changes to read as follows:
711 "§28-3A-13.1
712 (a) Any entity licensed by the board for off-premises
713 consumption, restaurant licensee of the board, or valid and
714 responsible organization of good reputation that is registered
715 to do business in the state may apply for and be issued a
716 delivery service license. In order to receive a license, an
717 applicant shall do all of the following:
718 (1) File an application with the board.
719 (2) Pay a non refundable nonrefundable filing fee of
720 one hundred dollars ($100), and a license fee of two hundred
721 fifty dollars ($250).
722 (3) Provide to the board a sample contract that the
723 applicant intends to enter into with a retailer for the
724 delivery of beer, wine, and spirits, unless the applicant is
725 the retailer.
726 (4)a. Provide to the board both of the following:
727 1. An attestation that the applicant is 21 years of age
728 or older.
Page 26

or older.
HB593 Enrolled
729 2. A true, correct, and complete criminal court record
730 of all arrests and subsequent dispositions for the past three
731 years. If the applicant has been convicted of a felony or a
732 misdemeanor for a violation of Section 28-3A-25(a)(3), then
733 the board shall reject the application and shall not issue a
734 license.
735 b. This subdivision shall not apply to publicly traded
736 companies.
737 (5)a. For an applicant with four or more delivery
738 drivers, whether those drivers are employees or independent
739 contractors, provide proof of a general liability insurance
740 policy in an amount no less than five million dollars
741 ($5,000,000) per occurrence.
742 b. For an applicant with three or fewer delivery
743 drivers, whether those delivery drivers are employees or
744 independent contractors, provide proof of a general liability
745 insurance policy in an amount no less than two million dollars
746 ($2,000,000) per occurrence.
747 (6) Provide to the board an outline for an internal or
748 external training and certification program for delivery
749 personnel which addresses topics such as identifying underage
750 individuals, intoxicated individuals, and fake or altered
751 identification.
752 (b) A delivery service licensee may deliver, or
753 contract with any retailer in the state for the delivery of,
754 beer, wine, or spirits from a retail premises to an individual
755 in the state who is at least 21 years of age, for personal use
756 by that individual only, and not for resale, subject to all of
Page 27

by that individual only, and not for resale, subject to all of
HB593 Enrolled
757 the following:
758 (1) The individual placing the order must receive the
759 ordered alcoholic beverages on the same calendar day that the
760 alcoholic beverages are removed from the licensed retail
761 premises.
762 (2) Any delivery shall be made in vehicles that are
763 owned or leased by the delivery service licensee or an
764 employee or independent contractor of the licensee.
765 (3) Any beer, wine, or spirits shall be delivered in a
766 sealed unopened container.
767 (4) If the delivery service licensee is a restaurant,
768 then any beer, wine, or spirits delivered by the licensee must
769 be accompanied by a meal.
770 (5) If the delivery service licensee is a manufacturer
771 or brewpub with off-premises retail privileges under Sections
772 28-3A-6, 28-4A-3, 28-4A-20, 28-4A-40, 28-4A-60, or 28-7-18,
773 the manufacturer or brewpub may deliver, directly from the
774 manufacturer or brewpub to any individual in any single
775 24-hour period, an amount not to exceed the amount that the
776 manufacturer or brewpub is authorized to sell to each customer
777 each day under Sections 28-3A-6 or 28-4A-3.
778 (6)a.1. Beer, with the exception of draft beer, may be
779 delivered in any size container, provided that the total
780 amount delivered does not exceed the equivalent of 120
781 12-ounce containers of beer per customer in any single 24-hour
782 period.
783 2. Draft beer may be sold in accordance with board
784 rules in a total amount not to exceed 288 ounces per customer
Page 28

rules in a total amount not to exceed 288 ounces per customer
HB593 Enrolled
785 in any single 24-hour period, and may be delivered only where
786 delivery has been authorized by resolution or ordinance of the
787 local governing jurisdiction.
788 b. Wine may be sold in any size container, provided
789 that the total amount delivered does not exceed 9,000
790 milliliters or the equivalent of 12twelve 750-milliliter
791 bottles of wine per customer in any single 24-hour period.
792 c. Spirits may be sold in any size bottle by an
793 off-premises licensee;, provided, the total amount delivered
794 does not exceed 9,000 milliliters per customer in any single
795 24-hour period.
796 d. Spirits may be sold in any size bottle by a
797 restaurant licensee;, provided, the total amount delivered
798 does not exceed 375 milliliters per customer in any single
799 24-hour period.
800 (7) Any employee or independent contractor delivering
801 beer, wine, or spirits shall comply with all of the following:
802 a. Is at least 21 years of age.
803 b. Has a valid driver's driver license.
804 c. Has, within the last 24 months, undergone a criminal
805 history background check that includes driving records, and
806 the results of which comply with all of the following:
807 1. The individual has not been convicted within the
808 past seven years of driving under the influence.
809 2. The individual has not been convicted, at any time,
810 of a crime involving a sexual offense, fraud, property damage,
811 theft, an act of violence, or an act of terror.
812 3. The individual does not have a match on the National
Page 29

3. The individual does not have a match on the National
HB593 Enrolled
813 Sex Offender Registry.
814 d. Does not receive compensation based on whether an
815 attempted delivery of beer, wine, or spirits results in a
816 completed transaction.
817 e. Is trained and certified consistent with the
818 training program submitted to the board as required by
819 subdivision (a)(6), with documentation on file with the
820 delivery service licensee. Upon request, the licensee shall
821 provide this documentation to the board.
822 (8) A delivery service licensee may facilitate orders
823 for the sale and delivery of beer, wine, or spirits by
824 telephone, Internet, or by other electronic means;, provided,
825 all of the following occur:
826 a. The delivery service licensee shall obtain from the
827 customer a confirmation that he or she is at least 21 years of
828 age at the time the order is placed.
829 b. The delivery service licensee shall ensure all
830 payments have been processed for delivery prior to removing
831 the alcoholic beverages from the licensed premises.
832 c. If the delivery service licensee is a retail
833 licensee, any order for sale and delivery of beer, wine, or
834 spirits received at the licensee's primary place of business
835 or through a third party third-party licensee or facilitator
836 shall be construed as a sale made at the licensee's primary
837 place of business.
838 (9) Any delivery in a sealed package shall be stamped,
839 printed, or labeled in a manner approved by the board, and
840 that stamp, print, or label shall be prominently displayed on
Page 30

that stamp, print, or label shall be prominently displayed on
HB593 Enrolled
841 the outside of the sealed package to indicate in readily
842 apparent font or type that the package contains alcohol and
843 that the signature of an individual at least 21 years of age
844 is required for delivery.
845 (10) A delivery service licensee shall require each
846 recipient, at the time of delivery, to provide valid photo
847 identification that conforms to board rules and that verifies
848 that he or she is at least 21 years of age, and shall require
849 the recipient to sign for the delivery.
850 (11) A delivery service licensee shall possess
851 identification scanning software technology, or a
852 state-of-the-art alternative approved by the board, available
853 at the point of delivery that verifies the recipient is at
854 least 21 years of age and retains the recipient's name, date
855 of birth, and signature.
856 (12) A delivery service licensee shall provide each
857 employee or independent contractor making a delivery with
858 either a printed copy of the delivery service license or an
859 electronic copy indicating the delivery service license's
860 licensee's name and number, which shall be available for
861 inspection upon request from the board or any law enforcement
862 officer.
863 (13) A delivery service licensee shall return any beer,
864 wine, or spirits to the retailer if the recipient is under the
865 age of 21 years of age; appears intoxicated; fails to provide
866 proof of identification; fails or refuses to sign for
867 delivery; fails to complete the identification scanning
868 software process or state-of-the-art alternative; declines to
Page 31

software process or state-of-the-art alternative; declines to
HB593 Enrolled
869 accept the delivery of beer, wine, or spirits; or any
870 circumstances in the delivery environment which indicate
871 illegal conduct, overconsumption, or an otherwise unsafe
872 environment for the consumption of alcohol. In no event shall
873 a delivery service licensee leave an alcoholic beverage
874 delivery unattended.
875 (14) A delivery service licensee may deliverdrive
876 through a dry county or municipality to deliver, but may not
877 deliver or cause a delivery to be made to an individual
878 residing in a dry county or dry municipality. Every employee
879 or independent contractor conducting a delivery shall maintain
880 within the delivery vehicle evidence, electronic or otherwise,
881 that the intended recipient of any alcoholic beverages is not
882 located in a dry county or dry municipality.
883 (15) A delivery service licensee may deliver alcoholic
884 beverages only during hours when alcoholic beverages may be
885 sold under general or local law.
886 (16) A delivery service licensee may not deliver any
887 alcoholic beverage to any residence hall on the grounds of any
888 institution of higher learning, including any college,
889 university, community college, technical college, or junior
890 college.
891 (17) A delivery service licensee may not deliver
892 alcoholic beverages to a location more than 75 miles from the
893 licensed premise of the retail licensee where the delivery
894 originated.
895 (18) A delivery service licensee may not deliver any
896 alcoholic beverage to any licensee of the board.
Page 32

alcoholic beverage to any licensee of the board.
HB593 Enrolled
897 (19) A delivery service licensee shall report, at the
898 direction of the board, the total amount of beer, wine, or
899 spirits directly delivered to residents in the state during
900 the preceding calendar year.
901 (20) A delivery service licensee shall permit the board
902 or the Department of Revenue to perform an audit of the
903 licensee's records upon request.
904 (c) A delivery service licensee shall be deemed to have
905 consented to the jurisdiction of the board, any law
906 enforcement agency, and the Alabama courts concerning
907 enforcement of this section and any related laws or rules.
908 (d) A delivery service licensee shall be considered to
909 be a servant or agent of the retail licensee with whom the
910 delivery service licensee has contracts, and any violation by
911 the delivery service licensee, its employees, or its
912 independent contractors may also be deemed to be a violation
913 by the retail licensee.
914 (e) A technology services company shall not be required
915 to obtain a delivery service license if the company does not
916 employ or contract with the individual making the deliveries,
917 but merely provides software or a digital network application
918 that connects consumers and licensed retailers for the
919 delivery of alcoholic beverages from a licensed retailer.
920 (f) A delivery service licensee may renew its license
921 with the board by paying an annual renewal fee of two hundred
922 fifty dollars ($250) and by otherwise complying with the
923 renewal process set forth in Section 28-3A-5.
924 (g) The board may enforce the requirements of this
Page 33

(g) The board may enforce the requirements of this
HB593 Enrolled
925 section to suspend or revoke a delivery service license by the
926 same administrative proceedings that apply to alcoholic
927 beverage licenses, and the board may accept payment of a fine
928 in lieu of suspension or revocation. The payments shall be as
929 determined by rule of the board.
930 (h) Except as provided in this section, local
931 ordinances establishing different rules on delivery, delivery
932 service licensees, or requiring additional permits or fees,
933 are prohibited.
934 (i) The board may adopt rules pursuant to the Alabama
935 Administrative Procedure Act to implement this section.
936 (j) Any violation of this section is a Class B
937 misdemeanor upon a first conviction. A second or subsequent
938 conviction is a Class A misdemeanor."
939 Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
940 1, 2026.
Page 34

1, 2026.
HB593 Enrolled
941
942
943
944
945
946
947
948
949
950 ________________________________________________
951 Speaker of the House of Representatives
952
953
954
955 ________________________________________________
956 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
957
958
959 House of Representatives
960
961 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
962 was passed by the House 31-Mar-26, as amended.
963
964 John Treadwell
965 Clerk
966
967
968
969
970
971 Senate 07-Apr-26 Amended and Passed
972
973 House 07-Apr-26 Concurred in Senate
974 Amendment
975
976
Page 35